Utah statutes.
53C-2-103.   Director's authority to examine records and inspect property.

For the purpose of determining compliance with any rule or any performance or payment obligation under a lease, permit, or contract, the director may, at reasonable times, places, and intervals:

(1)  require that the lessee, permittee, or contractor provide any pertinent books, records, or other documents of the lessee, permittee, or contractor; and

(2)  inspect the property acquired, used, or developed under the lease, permit, or contract after reasonable notice or as provided in the lease, permit, or contract.

